Utah, session 2026, HB147.
Section 1. Section 11-72-101 is enacted to read:72. Local Government - Interaction with Citizens and Others 11-72-101. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Incarcerated individual" means an individual who is confined in a prison, jail, or other correctional facility.(2)"Local government" means a political subdivision of the state, including:(a)a county, city, town, school district, special district, or special service district;(b)an agency or office of a political subdivision of the state; or(c)an official or employee of:(i)a political subdivision of the state; or(ii)an entity described in Subsection (2)(a) or (b).

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 11-72-102 is enacted to read:11-72-102. Electronic submission of forms, records, and other information.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2) or (3), and subject to Subsection (4), if a local government requires or requests a person to submit a form, a record, or information to the local government, the local government shall, instead of requiring the person to appear in person or otherwise provide a physical copy of the form, the record, or information, provide an electronic means for the person to submit the form, record, or information, which may include, at the discretion of the local government:(a)electronically completing and electronically signing the form;(b)downloading the form, completing and physically or electronically signing the form, and submitting a copy of the completed and signed form electronically, by email or other electronic means;(c)entering the information online;(d)uploading the completed and signed form, the record, or the information; or(e)sending the record or information by email or other electronic means.(2)Subsection (1) does not apply:(a)to the extent prohibited by an express provision of:(i)federal law or rule;(ii)state law; or(iii)court rule;(b)to the extent that the person is required by state or federal law to fill out the form in person or to submit the form, record, or information in person;(c)if the person is required to submit a fingerprint with the form, record, or information:(i)by state or federal law; or(ii)for the purpose of conducting a criminal background check;(d)if the person is an incarcerated individual;(e)to a marriage license, if the local government requires an individual to be present to obtain a marriage license; or(f)to a form, record, or information relating to an election governed by Title 20A, Election Code.(3)(a)Until January 1, 2030, Subsection (1) does not apply to a local government with an annual fiscal year that:(i)has annual revenue of $1,000,000 or less; or(ii)has annual expenditures of $1,000,000 or less.(b)Until July 1, 2030, Subsection (1) does not apply to a local government, with a fiscal year other than a calendar fiscal year, that:(i)has annual revenue of $1,000,000 or less; or(ii)has annual expenditures of $1,000,000 or less.(4)Subsection (1) applies regardless of whether the purpose of the requirement or request is to:(a)comply with a requirement of law;(b)request a service or thing; or(c)request or compel government action or forbearance.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 63G-34-101 is enacted to read:34. State Government - Interaction with Citizens and Others 63G-34-101. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Incarcerated individual" means an individual who is confined in a prison, jail, or other correctional facility.(2)(a)"State government" means:(i)a branch of state government;(ii)a department, agency, or other entity of state government;(iii)an independent entity, as defined in Section 63E-1-102; or(iv)an official or employee of an entity described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) through (iii).(b)"State government" does not include local government, as defined in Section 11-72-101.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 63G-34-102 is enacted to read:63G-34-102. Electronic submission of forms, records, and other information.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), and subject to Subsection (3), if state government requires or requests a person to submit a form, a record, or information to state government, state government shall, instead of requiring the person to appear in person or otherwise provide a physical copy of the form, the record, or information, provide an electronic means for the person to submit the form, record, or information, which may include, at the discretion of state government:(a)electronically completing and electronically signing the form;(b)downloading the form, completing and physically or electronically signing the form, and submitting a copy of the completed and signed form electronically, by email or other electronic means;(c)entering the information online;(d)uploading the completed and signed form, the record, or the information; or(e)sending the record or information by email or other electronic means.(2)Subsection (1) does not apply:(a)to the extent prohibited by an express provision of:(i)federal law or rule;(ii)state law; or(iii)court rule;(b)to the extent that the person is required by state or federal law to fill out the form in person or to submit the form, record, or information in person;(c)if the person is required to submit a fingerprint with the form, record, or information:(i)by state or federal law; or(ii)for the purpose of conducting a criminal background check;(d)if the person is an incarcerated individual;(e)in relation to a notarized document, if state government requires the person to submit the original notarized document; or(f)to a form, record, or information relating to an election governed by Title 20A, Election Code.(3)Subsection (1) applies regardless of whether the purpose of the requirement or request is to:(a)comply with a requirement of law;(b)request a service or thing; or(c)request or compel government action or forbearance.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2027.